Maine, session 132, LD913.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA c. 37, as amended, is amended to read:
CHAPTER 37
SALE AND RESALE OF TICKETS
§1301. Resale Sale and resale of tickets
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Entertainment event" means an event for which a ticket has been purchased,
including, but not limited to, a performance, concert, exhibit, game or contest.
A-1. "Bot" means any program, device or software designed to circumvent security
measures or access controls on a ticket sales platform to obtain tickets.
B. "Place of entertainment" means a facility used to host an entertainment event
including, but not limited to, a theater, stadium, arena, racetrack, museum or
amusement park.
B-1. "Mandatory fee" means a fee or charge required as part of the advertised price of
a ticket, including, but not limited to, a service fee or convenience fee.
B-2. "Service fee" means an additional fee added to the total price of a ticket to pay
for administrative costs, including, but not limited to, ticket software, credit card
processing and venue fees.
B-3. "Speculative ticket" means a ticket not in the actual or constructive possession of
the ticket reseller at the time the ticket is listed for resale.
C. "Ticket" means documentation of a right to attend an entertainment event.
Page 1 - 132LR1184(03)

C-1. "Ticket issuer" means a person or entity that issues tickets for original sale,
including, but not limited to, musicians or their agents, venues, promoters, theater
companies and marketplaces for initial purchases. "Ticket issuer" does not include a
nonprofit corporation as defined in Title 13-B, section 102, subsection 9.
D. "Ticket reseller" means a business entity whose primary business is the sale or
resale of tickets. "Ticket reseller" does not include any of the following: a nonprofit
corporation as defined in Title 13-B, section 102, subsection 9.
(1) A nonprofit corporation as defined in Title 13‑B, section 102, subsection 9; or
(2) A place of entertainment that engages in the sale or resale of tickets to
entertainment events at the place of entertainment.
E. "Total price" means the maximum total of all fees or charges a consumer must pay
for a ticket, except that shipping charges and government charges may be excluded.
F. "Venue" means a place of entertainment used to host an entertainment event,
including, but not limited to, a theater, stadium, arena, racetrack, museum or
amusement park.
1-A. Required ticket disclosures. A ticket reseller or ticket issuer advertising,
offering for sale, selling or reselling a ticket shall:
A. Clearly and conspicuously disclose the total price of the ticket, including all
mandatory fees, whenever the price is advertised or displayed;
B. Display the total price of the ticket more prominently than other pricing information
in all advertisements, offers or displays;
C. Provide a complete itemization of the total price of the ticket that includes the
nature, purpose and amount of any mandatory fee in a font size smaller than that of the
total price; and
D. Clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer at the time of purchase the seat
number or section at the venue associated with the ticket.
2. Refunds required. A ticket reseller that engages in the resale of a ticket in the
State to a place of entertainment venue shall, upon the request of the customer consumer,
refund the amount paid by the customer consumer for the ticket in any of the following
circumstances:
A. The entertainment event is cancelled;
B. The ticket is not accepted by the entity venue holding the entertainment event
because it is counterfeit or does not conform with the requirements established by the
entity venue holding the entertainment event or was never inventoried by the ticket
issuer or recognized at the venue as valid;
C. The ticket is cancelled by the entity venue holding the entertainment event for any
reason; or
D. The person who purchased the ticket consumer does not receive the ticket in time
to attend the entertainment event.; or
E. The ticket reseller made a material misrepresentation relating to the sale of the
ticket.
Page 2 - 132LR1184(03)

A person operating a venue shall provide a person holding a counterfeit, duplicate or
otherwise invalid ticket purchased from a ticket reseller the contact information for the
Office of the Attorney General.
This subsection does not prevent a ticket issuer from setting limits on maximum ticket
purchases or enforcing terms and conditions. For the purposes of this subsection, a ticket
to an entertainment event is deemed a license.
2-A. Prohibited practices. A ticket reseller or ticket issuer may not:
A. Misrepresent any fee or charge associated with a ticket in any advertisement, offer
or display;
B. Exclude a mandatory fee from the advertised price of a ticket without clearly and
conspicuously disclosing the nature, purpose and amount of the mandatory fee prior to
a consumer's consenting to pay for the ticket;
C. Sell or offer to sell or resell more than one copy of the same ticket to an
entertainment event;
D. Sell speculative tickets;
E. Use deceptive website addresses or imply endorsement or ownership of any
intellectual property of the venue or artist without explicit written authorization of the
venue or artist;
F. Circumvent Internet sales limitations using bots or similar tools; or
G. Charge more than 10% of the total price of the original ticket, including taxes and
fees, for the service of providing a marketplace for the resale of a ticket.
2-B. Enforcement. The Attorney General shall enforce this section.
3. Penalty. Violation of this section is an unfair trade practice as prohibited by Title
5, section 207.
Page 3 - 132LR1184(03)